Hawaii, session 2026, SB2412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii faces a growing shortage of qualified American Sign Language interpreters.  The 2024 report by the disability and communication access board, Assessment of American Sign Language Interpreting Services and the Interpreter Shortage in Hawaii, recommends establishing an American Sign Language interpreter training program within the university of Hawaii system. The legislature further finds that Hawaii is one of only eight states that does not have an American Sign Language interpreter training program.  More than two hundred certificate, associate, bachelor, and graduate level interpreter training programs are offered nationwide. The legislature believes that establishing a bachelor's degree program in sign language interpretation with a multi-year plan to include a master's degree program will eliminate the shortage of American Sign Language interpreters in the State and provide an academic and career path for Hawaii residents to become skilled professionals. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to address the State's American Sign Language interpreter shortage by appropriating moneys to establish a bachelor's degree program in American Sign Language interpretation at the university of Hawaii at Manoa campus with a multi-year plan to include a master's degree program. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $140,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to: (1)  Establish a bachelor's degree program in American Sign Language interpretation at the university of Hawaii Manoa campus; (2)  Develop a multi-year interpreter training program to include a masters degree in American Sign Language interpretation; and (3)  Provide personnel and administrative resources necessary to launch and sustain the programs. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________